dictionaries/tr/index.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2588 N 1
SFX 2588 0 deymişçesine .

SFX 2589 N 1
SFX 2589 0 larımaysa .

SFX 2590 N 1
SFX 2590 0 tılardı .

SFX 2591 N 1
SFX 2591 0 'yü .

SFX 2592 N 1
SFX 2592 0 ınızadır .

SFX 2593 N 1
SFX 2593 0 lardaydılar .

SFX 2594 N 1
SFX 2594 0 muzdaki .

SFX 2595 N 1
SFX 2595 0 'dakilerden .

SFX 2596 N 1
SFX 2596 0 'dakinden .

SFX 2597 N 1
SFX 2597 0 'dandı .

SFX 2598 N 1
SFX 2598 0 'mı .

SFX 2599 N 1
SFX 2599 0 'nı .

SFX 2600 N 1
SFX 2600 0 'nınkinden .

SFX 2601 N 1
SFX 2601 0 'nınkine .

SFX 2602 N 1
SFX 2602 0 'nınkini .

SFX 2603 N 1
SFX 2603 0 'nızı .

SFX 2604 N 1
SFX 2604 0 'yladır .

SFX 2605 N 1
SFX 2605 0 tuk .

SFX 2606 N 1
SFX 2606 0 tular .

SFX 2607 N 1
SFX 2607 0 turlar .

SFX 2608 N 1
SFX 2608 0 larındansınız .

SFX 2609 N 1
SFX 2609 0 muştum .

SFX 2610 N 1
SFX 2610 0 urdu .

SFX 2611 N 1
SFX 2611 0 urduk .

SFX 2612 N 1
SFX 2612 0 urdum .

SFX 2613 N 1
SFX 2613 0 urmuş .

SFX 2614 N 1
SFX 2614 0 ursak .

SFX 2615 N 1
SFX 2615 0 ursanız .

SFX 2616 N 1
SFX 2616 0 ursun .

SFX 2617 N 1
SFX 2617 0 ursunuz .

SFX 2618 N 1
SFX 2618 0 urum .

SFX 2619 N 1
SFX 2619 0 uruz .

SFX 2620 N 1
SFX 2620 0 uyorduk .

SFX 2621 N 1
SFX 2621 0 uyordum .

SFX 2622 N 1
SFX 2622 0 uyordunuz .

SFX 2623 N 1
SFX 2623 0 uyordur .

SFX 2624 N 1
SFX 2624 0 uyorlardı .

SFX 2625 N 1
SFX 2625 0 uyorsak .

SFX 2626 N 1
SFX 2626 0 'dasınız .

SFX 2627 N 1
SFX 2627 0 muştunuz .

SFX 2628 N 1
SFX 2628 0 muşumdur .

SFX 2629 N 1
SFX 2629 0 muşuz .

SFX 2630 N 1
SFX 2630 0 tum .

SFX 2631 N 1
SFX 2631 0 tunuz .

SFX 2632 N 1
SFX 2632 0 urlardı .

SFX 2633 N 1
SFX 2633 0 uyorlarmış .

SFX 2634 N 1
SFX 2634 0 larınızsa .

SFX 2635 N 1
SFX 2635 0 talarsa .

SFX 2636 N 1
SFX 2636 0 tayımdır .

SFX 2637 N 1
SFX 2637 0 taysak .

SFX 2638 N 1
SFX 2638 0 taysam .

SFX 2639 N 1
SFX 2639 0 'na .

SFX 2640 N 1
SFX 2640 0 'nu .

SFX 2641 N 1
SFX 2641 0 inkidir .

SFX 2642 N 1
SFX 2642 0 inkiler .

SFX 2643 N 1
SFX 2643 0 'ımız .

SFX 2644 N 1
SFX 2644 0 ınkinde .

SFX 2645 N 1
SFX 2645 0 lardansın .

SFX 2646 N 1
SFX 2646 0 acakmışlar .

SFX 2647 N 1
SFX 2647 0 zım .

SFX 2648 N 1
SFX 2648 0 ınınkinden .

SFX 2649 N 1
SFX 2649 0 ınınkinin .

SFX 2650 N 1
SFX 2650 0 ırdıysa .

SFX 2651 N 1
SFX 2651 0 ırdıysak .

SFX 2652 N 1
SFX 2652 0 ırdıysanız .

SFX 2653 N 1
SFX 2653 0 ırmışımdır .

SFX 2654 N 1
SFX 2654 0 ırmışızdır .

SFX 2655 N 1
SFX 2655 0 ırmışsa .

SFX 2656 N 1
SFX 2656 0 ırmışsanız .

SFX 2657 N 1
SFX 2657 0 ırmışsınızdır .

SFX 2658 N 1
SFX 2658 0 ırsalar .

SFX 2659 N 1
SFX 2659 0 ırsalardı .

SFX 2660 N 1
SFX 2660 0 ndayızdır .

SFX 2661 N 1
SFX 2661 0 indeymişçesine .

SFX 2662 N 1
SFX 2662 0 'umuzu .

SFX 2663 N 1
SFX 2663 0 'unu .

SFX 2664 N 1
SFX 2664 0 'uyla .

SFX 2665 N 1
SFX 2665 0 lardakilerinden .

SFX 2666 N 1
SFX 2666 0 larındakinden .

SFX 2667 N 1
SFX 2667 0 larındaydık .

SFX 2668 N 1
SFX 2668 0 larındaymışız .

SFX 2669 N 1
SFX 2669 0 'se .

SFX 2670 N 1
SFX 2670 0 ıyızdır .

SFX 2671 N 1
SFX 2671 0 taymışlar .

SFX 2672 N 1
SFX 2672 0 sınıdır .

SFX 2673 N 1
SFX 2673 0 'di .

SFX 2674 N 1
SFX 2674 0 ymişçesine .

SFX 2675 N 1
SFX 2675 0 nınkiyse .

SFX 2676 N 1
SFX 2676 0 ımsak .

SFX 2677 N 1
SFX 2677 0 tansan .

SFX 2678 N 1
SFX 2678 0 tansanız .

SFX 2679 N 1
SFX 2679 0 tansınız .

SFX 2680 N 1
SFX 2680 0 taymışız .

SFX 2681 N 1
SFX 2681 0 taysan .

SFX 2682 N 1
SFX 2682 0 zmiş .

SFX 2683 N 1
SFX 2683 0 yecekse .

SFX 2684 N 1
SFX 2684 0 'larından .

SFX 2685 N 1
SFX 2685 0 mınkileri .

SFX 2686 N 1
SFX 2686 0 mınkini .

SFX 2687 N 1
SFX 2687 0 'mıza .

SFX 2688 N 1
SFX 2688 0 'nındır .

SFX 2689 N 1
SFX 2689 0 nınkinde .

SFX 2690 N 1
SFX 2690 0 nınkinin .

SFX 2691 N 1
SFX 2691 0 nızınki .

SFX 2692 N 1
SFX 2692 0 nızınkiyle .

SFX 2693 N 1
SFX 2693 0 nızız .

SFX 2694 N 1
SFX 2694 0 nızmış .

SFX 2695 N 1
SFX 2695 0 sınındır .

SFX 2696 N 1
SFX 2696 0 sınınkiler .

SFX 2697 N 1
SFX 2697 0 sınınkileri .

SFX 2698 N 1
SFX 2698 0 sınınkinden .

SFX 2699 N 1
SFX 2699 0 sınınkine .

SFX 2700 N 1
SFX 2700 0 sınınkini .

SFX 2701 N 1
SFX 2701 0 sınınkinin .

SFX 2702 N 1
SFX 2702 0 sınınkiyle .

SFX 2703 N 1
SFX 2703 0 sınınmış .

SFX 2704 N 1
SFX 2704 0 sısındır .

SFX 2705 N 1
SFX 2705 0 sıylayken .

SFX 2706 N 1
SFX 2706 0 sıymışım .

SFX 2707 N 1
SFX 2707 0 sıysan .

SFX 2708 N 1
SFX 2708 0 'deydik .

SFX 2709 N 1
SFX 2709 0 sısınızdır .

SFX 2710 N 1
SFX 2710 0 sıydınız .

SFX 2711 N 1
SFX 2711 0 larımızdakinden .

SFX 2712 N 1
SFX 2712 0 larındakilerden .

SFX 2713 N 1
SFX 2713 0 mızdandır .

SFX 2714 N 1
SFX 2714 0 irlikle .

SFX 2715 N 1
SFX 2715 0 ydıysa .

SFX 2716 N 1
SFX 2716 0 ymışsınız .

SFX 2717 N 1
SFX 2717 0 deyimdir .

SFX 2718 N 1
SFX 2718 0 lerdekiler .

SFX 2719 N 1
SFX 2719 0 lerindeyse .

SFX 2720 N 1
SFX 2720 0 mdesiniz .

SFX 2721 N 1
SFX 2721 0 mdeyken .

SFX 2722 N 1
SFX 2722 0 mdeymişçesine .

SFX 2723 N 1
SFX 2723 0 sindedirler .

SFX 2724 N 1
SFX 2724 0 sindekilerle .

SFX 2725 N 1
SFX 2725 0 sindekinden .

SFX 2726 N 1
SFX 2726 0 sindekini .

SFX 2727 N 1
SFX 2727 0 sindeydiler .

SFX 2728 N 1
SFX 2728 0 sindeymişim .

SFX 2729 N 1
SFX 2729 0 sineyse .

SFX 2730 N 1
SFX 2730 0 yeceksek .

SFX 2731 N 1
SFX 2731 0 zdin .

SFX 2732 N 1
SFX 2732 0 zdiniz .

SFX 2733 N 1
SFX 2733 0 zsiniz .

SFX 2734 N 1
SFX 2734 0 iyormuşçasına .

SFX 2735 N 1
SFX 2735 0 teyizdir .

SFX 2736 N 1
SFX 2736 0 miştiniz .

SFX 2737 N 1
SFX 2737 0 yecektik .

SFX 2738 N 1
SFX 2738 0 yecektim .

SFX 2739 N 1
SFX 2739 0 zsem .

SFX 2740 N 1
SFX 2740 0 tiysek .

SFX 2741 N 1
SFX 2741 0 lardırlar .

SFX 2742 N 1
SFX 2742 0 eceksinizdir .

SFX 2743 N 1
SFX 2743 0 larınınkilerin .

SFX 2744 N 1
SFX 2744 0 larınızız .

SFX 2745 N 1
SFX 2745 0 larınızca .

SFX 2746 N 1
SFX 2746 0 armışçasına .

SFX 2747 N 1
SFX 2747 0 armışsınız .

SFX 2748 N 1
SFX 2748 0 kisin .

SFX 2749 N 1
SFX 2749 0 mdayız .

SFX 2750 N 1
SFX 2750 0 nasınız .

SFX 2751 N 1
SFX 2751 0 nsak .

SFX 2752 N 1
SFX 2752 0 nsalardı .

SFX 2753 N 1
SFX 2753 0 'ünü .

SFX 2754 N 1
SFX 2754 0 eymiş .

SFX 2755 N 1
SFX 2755 0 ıyorlardıysa .

SFX 2756 N 1
SFX 2756 0 edirler .

SFX 2757 N 1
SFX 2757 0 eydim .

SFX 2758 N 1
SFX 2758 0 eyken .

SFX 2759 N 1
SFX 2759 0 eymişçesine .

SFX 2760 N 1
SFX 2760 0 eyseniz .

SFX 2761 N 1
SFX 2761 0 tayızdır .

SFX 2762 N 1
SFX 2762 0 undadırlar .

SFX 2763 N 1
SFX 2763 0 undaydık .

SFX 2764 N 1
SFX 2764 0 undaydım .

SFX 2765 N 1
SFX 2765 0 undayız .

SFX 2766 N 1
SFX 2766 0 unum .

SFX 2767 N 1
SFX 2767 0 unuzdaki .

SFX 2768 N 1
SFX 2768 0 unuzdakinden .

SFX 2769 N 1
SFX 2769 0 unuzun .

SFX 2770 N 1
SFX 2770 0 nmuş .

SFX 2771 N 1
SFX 2771 0 nudur .

SFX 2772 N 1
SFX 2772 0 num .

SFX 2773 N 1
SFX 2773 0 unla .

SFX 2774 N 1
SFX 2774 0 suyuz .

SFX 2775 N 1
SFX 2775 0 'teydi .

SFX 2776 N 1
SFX 2776 0 larınkilere .

SFX 2777 N 1
SFX 2777 0 sündedir .

SFX 2778 N 1
SFX 2778 0 nuzdaki .

SFX 2779 N 1
SFX 2779 0 ındılardı .

SFX 2780 N 1
SFX 2780 0 lerlerine .

SFX 2781 N 1
SFX 2781 0 muzca .

SFX 2782 N 1
SFX 2782 0 irliğiniz .

SFX 2783 N 1
SFX 2783 0 larındakilerin .

SFX 2784 N 1
SFX 2784 0 ıncadır .

SFX 2785 N 1
SFX 2785 0 ınınkilerden .

SFX 2786 N 1
SFX 2786 0 ecekmişçesine .

SFX 2787 N 1
SFX 2787 0 lersek .

SFX 2788 N 1
SFX 2788 0 sunuz .

SFX 2789 N 1
SFX 2789 0 yumdur .

SFX 2790 N 1
SFX 2790 0 nıdır .

SFX 2791 N 1
SFX 2791 0 ummuş .

SFX 2792 N 1
SFX 2792 0 alarsa .

SFX 2793 N 1
SFX 2793 0 ecekmişsiniz .

SFX 2794 N 1
SFX 2794 0 iyormuşsun .

SFX 2795 N 1
SFX 2795 0 mişseniz .

SFX 2796 N 1
SFX 2796 0 zsalar .

SFX 2797 N 1
SFX 2797 0 asındır .

SFX 2798 N 1
SFX 2798 0 asınızdır .

SFX 2799 N 1
SFX 2799 0 ımızındır .

SFX 2800 N 1
SFX 2800 0 ımızınki .

SFX 2801 N 1
SFX 2801 0 ınkileri .

SFX 2802 N 1
SFX 2802 0 larındansın .

SFX 2803 N 1
SFX 2803 0 'umun .

SFX 2804 N 1
SFX 2804 0 unkileri .

SFX 2805 N 1
SFX 2805 0 uyuz .

SFX 2806 N 1
SFX 2806 0 uyken .

SFX 2807 N 1
SFX 2807 0 ımaydı .

SFX 2808 N 1
SFX 2808 0 ımaydım .

SFX 2809 N 1
SFX 2809 0 ımayım .

SFX 2810 N 1
SFX 2810 0 ımayken .
