dictionaries/tr/index.dic
attık/26,27,28,29,48,49,50,52,123,124,125,128,224,430,432,433,434,435,437,438,439,441,442,801,803,2589
Avrupa/9,10,24,219,226,229,320,1084,1086,1087,1094,1096,1098,1323,1333,1376,1377,1711,2026,2027,2029,2030,2036,2126,2173,2595,2596,2597,2598,2599,2600,2601,2602,2603,2604
Doğu/10,219,229,320,1098,1634,1643,2026,2144,2596,4187,4188
İnönü/35,36,39,237,238,244,308,310,1863,1977,2463,2591,3064,4129,4687,5317,5318,5319,5320
koşuştur/60,113,114,192,558,661,733,822,854,875,1176,1177,1179,1180,1899,1904,1905,1907,1913,1916,2610,2611,2619,2620,2624,2632,3362,3363
mensup/14,15,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,48,49,50,52,59,91,117,121,122,123,124,125,128,141,178,192,193,223,224,430,433,434,435,436,437,438,439,441,442,514,515,563,577,580,582,583,795,796,802,803,804,926,934,985,1057,1058,1061,1063,1068,1070,1071,1177,1619,2116,2429,2582,2606,2607,2629,2630,5773,5774
mesut/14,15,22,26,27,48,52,91,223,514,515,1177,2607,2629,2630
müptela/12,14,15,16,18,23,26,27,28,29,49,50,51,53,123,125,128,131,133,134,136,143,145,146,182,183,473,474,475,476,826,985,1132,1378,1615,2209,2608,2706,3778
namağlup/14,22,26,514,515,2605,2606
okun/58,114,142,557,558,622,724,822,854,875,1178,1179,1180,1735,1901,1902,1903,1904,1905,1906,1907,1911,1913,1914,1915,1916,2609,2610,2613,2616,2617,2618,2623,2624,2913,3361,3417,3605,3608,3610,3611,3612,3618,4201,5843,5844,5845,5846,5847,5848,5849,5850
okuttur/58,113,114,118,661,822,1176,1177,1179,1180,1899,1900,1901,1907,1913,1916,2609,2610,2624,2625
olun/58,114,116,142,557,558,619,622,724,822,875,1178,1179,1180,1901,1902,1903,1904,1905,1906,1913,1915,2610,2613,2617,2619,2632,2913,2915,3615
oluşturul/11,60,114,141,142,557,558,622,661,723,724,733,822,875,1176,1177,1178,1179,1180,1899,1901,1903,1904,1905,1906,1908,1913,2610,2613,2623,2909,2913
ovuştur/11,31,114,141,518,661,733,822,875,1176,1177,1178,1179,1180,1899,1900,1904,1905,1907,1912,1916,2609,2610,2611,2613,2618,2619,2620,2621,2623,2624,3411
öte/9999,1,2,3,4,6,7,8,35,36,37,38,39,41,54,252,253,254,255,256,283,284,311,312,325,333,335,357,359,361,383,384,385,386,390,391,392,395,416,421,426,485,552,648,964,1183,1229,1230,1233,1234,1235,1236,1240,1360,1439,1441,1442,1469,1484,1486,2133,2169,2511,2512,2588,2787,2975,3200,3463,3702
pano/13,14,15,17,19,20,21,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,48,49,50,54,55,122,123,125,128,178,435,446,459,486,516,517,524,534,577,733,783,796,797,799,804,1343,1434,1435,1436,1607,1630,1640,2081,2112,2113,2114,2282,2284,2385,2386,2477,2482,2492,2594,3374,6024
Romanya/9,10,219,229,320,1086,1095,1096,1098,1376,1711,2599
Rusya/9,10,219,229,320,1086,1091,1094,1096,1098,1376,1377,2029,2034,2036,2037,2595,2600,2639,6056
Sahra/9,10,219,320,1096,2626
savur/11,31,58,60,113,114,118,141,142,193,209,511,518,557,558,563,619,661,723,724,733,822,854,875,1176,1177,1178,1179,1180,1610,1899,1900,1901,1902,1903,1904,1905,1906,1907,1911,1913,1915,1916,2609,2610,2611,2613,2614,2615,2616,2618,2619,2620,2621,2623,2624,2629,2632,2908,2913,2919,2921,2922,3359
solut/515,822,1180,2615
soyun/58,60,113,114,116,142,557,558,564,619,622,724,727,729,812,822,854,875,912,1178,1179,1180,1901,1902,1903,1904,1905,1906,1907,1911,1912,1913,1914,1915,1916,2609,2610,2612,2614,2615,2616,2617,2618,2619,2620,2624,2625,2632,2913,2915,2916,2921,2922,3359,3362
Tara/9,10,226,229,1096,1333,2601
Tayland/217,219,222,229,230,320,2595
uzaklık/14,15,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,49,50,52,74,91,92,125,140,141,163,177,428,433,524,585,625,734,786,787,866,867,868,1418,1432,2593,2636
yarar/11,13,14,15,20,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,48,49,50,51,59,61,82,121,122,123,124,125,135,151,224,231,234,321,427,433,437,520,521,522,591,632,736,804,881,882,883,884,887,892,895,904,1011,1021,1206,1212,1213,1214,1228,2299,2592,6521
yutkun/11,31,60,114,118,141,142,193,511,619,661,822,875,1176,1177,1178,1180,1899,1900,1901,1903,1904,1905,1906,1907,1911,1914,1915,1916,2609,2610,2616,2617,2618,2619,2632,3362,3420
yuttur/11,58,113,114,116,216,511,557,619,661,822,875,1176,1177,1178,1179,1180,1899,1900,1901,1902,1903,1904,1905,1906,1907,1911,1915,2610,2614,2615,2616,2617,2618,2619,2918,2919
